District of Columbia statutes.
7-761.06

Appointment and authority of the Director.

(a)

The Department shall be headed by a Director who shall report to the Mayor. The Mayor shall appoint the Director with the advice and consent of the Council pursuant to § 1-523.01(a).

(b)

The Director shall:

(1)

Hold at least a master’s degree or its equivalent in human services, clinical services, human service management, public administration, social work, or a related field;

(2)

Have relevant work experience; and

(3)

Possess:

(A)

Demonstrated knowledge of current best-practice policies, programs, services, and supports for individuals with developmental disabilities;

(B)

Familiarity with local and federal funding streams supporting services to people with developmental disabilities; and

(C)

Experience managing human service programs.

(c)

The Director shall serve as the administrative chief of the Department, and may organize personnel, re-delegate authority, develop programs, and take any other action, including issuing grants and stipends, consistent with appropriations, as warranted to accomplish the purpose and mission of the Department or to satisfy the requirements of applicable court orders.

(d)

The Mayor shall delegate to the Director all personnel authority, including full authority to hire, retain, and terminate personnel, and the Director shall exercise that personnel authority independent of the Office of Personnel and consistent with applicable court orders.

(e)

The Mayor shall delegate to the Director all procurement authority, including contracting and contracting oversight, and the Director shall exercise that procurement authority independent of the Office of Contracting and Procurement and consistent with applicable court orders.

(f)

The Mayor shall fix the compensation of the Director pursuant to subchapter X-A of Chapter 6 of Title 1 [§§ 1-610.51 — 1-610.63].

History

Mar. 14, 2007, D.C. Law 16-264, § 106, 54 DCR 818
Feb. 26, 2015, D.C. Law 20-155, § 5002(c), 61 DCR 9990

Effect of Amendments

The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 20-155 added “including issuing grants and stipends” in (c).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 106 of Developmental Disabilities Services Management Reform Emergency Amendment Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-672, December 28, 2006, 54 DCR 1155).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 5002(c) of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-377, July 14, 2014, 61 DCR 7598, 20 STAT 3696).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 5002(c) of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-449, October 10, 2014, 61 DCR 10915, 20 STAT 4188).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 5002(c) of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Second Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-566, January 9, 2015, 62 DCR 884, 21 STAT 541).